Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.100

Persons who may bring action—Damages.

(1) Any one or more of the following persons who suffers damage proximately resulting from one or more acts of unlawful motor vehicle subleasing or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle may bring an action against the person who has engaged in those acts:

(a) A secured party;

(b) A debtor;

(c) A lessor;

(d) A lessee;

(e) An actual or purported transferee or assignee;

(f) A guarantor of a lease or security agreement or a guarantor of a purported transferee or assignee.

(2) In an action for unlawful subleasing or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle the court may award actual damages; equitable relief, including, but not limited to an injunction and restitution of money and property; reasonable attorneys' fees and costs; and any other relief that the court deems proper.

[ 1990 c 44 s 11.]